Utah statutes.
26-20-6.   Conspiracy to defraud prohibited.

A person may not enter into an agreement, combination, or conspiracy to defraud the state by obtaining or aiding another to obtain the payment or allowance of a false, fictitious, or fraudulent claim for a medical benefit.

